Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 13 Licensing of Mortgage Lenders and Mortgage Brokers
7-1-1009.
Maintenance of books, accounts, and records; investigation and examination of licensees and registrants by department; confidentiality; exemptions from civil liability.

Mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders required to be licensed or registered under this article shall maintain at their offices or such other location as the department shall permit such books, accounts, and records as the department may reasonably require in order to determine whether such mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders are complying with the provisions of this article and rules and regulations adopted in furtherance thereof. Such books, accounts, and records shall be maintained separately and distinctly from any other personal or unrelated business matters in which the mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders are involved.

The department shall investigate and examine the affairs, business, premises, and records of any mortgage broker or mortgage lender required to be licensed or registered under this article insofar as such affairs, business, premises, and records pertain to any business for which a license or registration is required by this article. The department may conduct such investigations and examinations as often as it deems necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this article, but shall conduct such investigations and examinations at least once every 60 months. In order to avoid unnecessary duplication of examinations, the department may accept examination reports performed and produced by other state or federal agencies, unless the department determines that the examinations are not available or do not provide the information necessary to fulfill the responsibilities of the department under this article. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, the department may alter the frequency or scope of investigations and examinations through rules and regulations prescribed by the department. If the department determines, based on the records submitted to the department and past history of operations of the licensee in the state, that such investigations or examinations are unnecessary, then the department may waive such investigations and examinations. In the case of registrants, the department shall not be required to conduct such examinations if it determines that the registrant has been adequately examined by another bank regulatory agency.

In addition to any authority allowed under this article, the department shall be authorized to conduct investigations and examinations of mortgage loan originators as follows:

For purposes of initial licensing, license renewal, license suspension, license conditioning, license revocation or termination, or general or specific inquiry or investigation to determine compliance with this article, the department shall have the authority to access, receive, and use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, information, or evidence, including, but not limited to:

Criminal, civil, and administrative history information, including nonconviction data;

Personal history and experience information, including independent credit reports obtained from a consumer reporting agency described in section 603(p) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 1681a(f); and

Any other documents, information, or evidence the department deems relevant to the inquiry or investigation regardless of the location, possession, control, or custody of such documents, information, or evidence;

For the purposes of investigating violations or complaints, or for the purposes of examination, the department may review, investigate, or examine any mortgage loan originator licensee, individual, or person subject to this article as often as necessary in order to carry out the purposes of this article. The department may direct, subpoena, or order the attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose testimony may be required about the loans or the business or subject matter of any such examination or investigation and may direct, subpoena, or order such person to produce books, accounts, records, files, and any other documents the department deems relevant to the inquiry;

Each mortgage loan originator licensee, individual, or person subject to this article shall make available to the department upon request the books and records relating to the activities of a mortgage loan originator;

Each mortgage loan originator subject to this article shall make or compile reports or prepare other information as directed by the commissioner in order to carry out the purposes of this subsection, including, but not limited to:

Accounting compilations;

Information lists and data concerning loan transactions in a format prescribed by the department; or

Use, hire, contract, or employ public or privately available analytical systems, methods, or software to examine or investigate a mortgage loan originator;

In making any examination or investigation authorized by this article, the department may control access to any documents and records of the licensee or person under investigation. In order to carry out the purposes of this Code section, the department may:

Enter into agreements or relationships with other government officials or regulatory associations in order to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory burden by sharing resources, standardized or uniform methods or procedures, and documents, records, information, or evidence obtained under this Code section;

Accept and rely on examination or investigation reports made by other government officials, within or without this state; and

Accept audit reports made by an independent certified public accountant for the licensee, individual, or person subject to this article in the course of that part of the examination covering the same general subject matter as the audit and may incorporate the audit report in the report of examination, report of investigation, or other writing of the department;

The authority to investigate provided for in this subsection shall remain in effect whether such licensee, individual, or person subject to this article acts or claims to act under any licensing or registration law of this state or claims to act without such authority; and

No mortgage loan originator licensee, individual, or person subject to investigation or examination under this article shall knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, or secrete any books, records, computer records, or other information.

The department, at its discretion, may:

Make such public or private investigations within or outside of this state as it deems necessary to determine whether any person has violated or is about to violate this article or any rule, regulation, or order under this article, to aid in the enforcement of this article, or to assist in the prescribing of rules and regulations pursuant to this article;

Require or permit any person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise as the department determines, as to all the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated;

Disclose information concerning any violation of this article or any rule, regulation, or order under this article, provided the information is derived from a final order of the department;

Disclose the imposition of an administrative fine or penalty under this article; and

Conduct an on-site examination without prior notice, with the licensee or registrant to pay the reasonably incurred costs for such examination, including out-of-state travel expenses, and the department shall be authorized to net such out-of-state expenses against the payments from the licensee or registrant.

For the purpose of conducting any investigation as provided in this Code section, the department shall have the power to administer oaths, to call any party to testify under oath in the course of such investigations, to require the attendance of witnesses, to require the production of books, records, and papers, and to take the depositions of witnesses; and for such purposes, the department is authorized to issue a subpoena for any witness or for the production of documentary evidence. Such subpoenas may be served by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, return receipt requested, to the addressee’s business mailing address, by examiners appointed by the department, or shall be directed for service to the sheriff of the county where such witness resides or is found or where the person in custody of any books, records, or paper resides or is found. The required fees and mileage of the sheriff, witness, or person shall be paid from the funds in the state treasury for the use of the department in the same manner that other expenses of the department are paid.

The department may issue and apply to enforce subpoenas in this state at the request of a government agency regulating mortgage lenders or brokers of another state if the activities constituting the alleged violation for which the information is sought would be a violation of this article if the activities had occurred in this state.

In case of refusal to obey a subpoena issued under this article to any person, a superior court of appropriate jurisdiction, upon application by the department, may issue to the person an order requiring him or her to appear before the court to show cause why he or she should not be held in contempt for refusal to obey the subpoena. Failure to obey a subpoena may be punished as contempt by the court.

Examinations and investigations conducted under this article and information obtained by the department in the course of its duties under this article are confidential, except as provided in this subsection, pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 7-1-70. In addition to the exceptions set forth in subsection (b) of Code Section 7-1-70 and in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection (d) of this Code section, the department is authorized to share information obtained under this article with other state and federal regulatory agencies or law enforcement authorities. In the case of such sharing, the safeguards to confidentiality already in place within such agencies or authorities shall be deemed adequate. The commissioner or an examiner specifically designated may disclose such limited information as is necessary to conduct a civil or administrative investigation or proceeding. Information contained in the records of the department which is not confidential and may be made available to the public either on the department’s website, upon receipt by the department of a written request, or in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry shall include:

For mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders, the name, business address, and telephone, facsimile, and unique identifier of a licensee or registrant;

For mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders, the names and titles of the principal officers;

For mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders, the name of the owner or owners thereof;

For mortgage brokers and mortgage lenders, the business address of a licensee’s or registrant’s agent for service; and

The terms of or a copy of any bond filed by a licensee or registrant.

In the absence of malice, fraud, or bad faith, a person shall not be subject to civil liability arising from the filing of a complaint with the department or furnishing other information required by this Code section or required by the department under the authority granted in this article. No civil cause of action of any nature shall arise against such person:

For any information relating to suspected prohibited acts furnished to or received from law enforcement officials, their agents, or employees or to or from other regulatory or licensing authorities;

For any such information furnished to or received from other persons subject to the provisions of this title; or

For any such information furnished in complaints filed with the department.

The commissioner or any employee or agent shall not be subject to civil liability, and no civil cause of action of any nature exists against such persons arising out of the performance of activities or duties under this article or by publication of any report of activities under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1009

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 18; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 30; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 36; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 30; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 14; Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, § 20; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 37/SB 70; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 7/HB 1387; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 26/HB 143; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 25/HB 780; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 35/HB 185; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 21/HB 781; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, in the last sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection (g), substituted “website, upon” for “website or upon” and inserted “, or in the Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” near the end. See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “The department may, by its designated officers and employees, as often as it deems necessary, but at least once every 24 months, investigate and examine the affairs, business, premises, and records of any mortgage broker or mortgage lender required to be licensed or registered under this article insofar as such affairs, business, premises, and records pertain to any business for which a license or registration is required by this article. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, the department has the discretion to examine a mortgage broker or mortgage lender less frequently, provided that its record of complaints, comments, or other information demonstrates that mortgage broker’s or mortgage lender’s ability to meet the standards of Code Sections 7-1-1003, 7-1-1003.2, and 7-1-1004. In the case of registrants, the department shall not be required to conduct such examinations if it determines that the registrant has been adequately examined by another bank regulatory agency. In order to avoid unnecessary duplication of examinations, the department may accept examination reports performed and produced by other state or federal agencies, unless the department determines that the examinations are not available or do not provide information necessary to fulfill the responsibilities of the department under this article.”

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, substituted “unique identifier” for “license numbers” in paragraph (g)(1). The second 2020 amendment, effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” in the last sentence of the introductory paragraph of subsection (g).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Business Associations,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2001).

7-1-1010.
Annual financial statements.

If a mortgage broker is a United States Department of Housing and Urban Development loan correspondent, such broker shall also submit to the department the audit that is required for the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development. The department may require the mortgage broker to have made an audit of the books and affairs of the licensed or registered business and submit to the department an audited financial statement if the department finds that such an audit is necessary to determine whether the mortgage broker is complying with the provisions of this article and the rules and regulations adopted in furtherance of this article.

Each mortgage lender licensed or registered under this article shall at least once each year have made an audit of the books and affairs of the licensed or registered business and submit to the department at renewal an audited financial statement, except that a mortgage lender licensed or registered under this article which is a subsidiary shall comply with this provision by annually providing a consolidated audited financial statement of its parent company and a financial statement, which may be unaudited, of the licensee or registrant which is prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A lender who utilizes a bond in lieu of an audit need not supply such audit, unless specially required by the department. An audit shall be less than 15 months old to be acceptable. The department may by regulation establish additional minimum standards for audits and reports under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1010

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 570, § 8; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 19; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 37; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 31; Ga. L. 2004, p. 458, § 14; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312.

7-1-1011.
Annual fees.

The department may, by regulation, prescribe annual fees to be paid by licensees and registrants, which fees shall be set at levels necessary to defray costs and expenses incurred by the state in providing the examinations and supervision required by this article and its federally mandated participation in the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, and which fees may vary according to whether a person is a licensee or registrant or is a mortgage loan originator, mortgage broker, or a mortgage lender.

As used in this subsection, the term “collecting agent” means the person listed as the secured party on a security deed or other loan document that establishes a lien on the residential real property taken as collateral at the time of the closing of the mortgage loan transaction.

There shall be imposed on the closing of every mortgage loan subject to regulation under this article which, as defined in Code Section 7-1-1000, includes all mortgage loans, whether or not closed by a mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensee or registrant, a fee of $10.00. The fee shall be paid by the borrower to the collecting agent at the time of closing of the mortgage loan transaction. The collecting agent shall remit the fee to the department at the time and in the manner specified by regulation of the department. Revenue collected by the department pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the general fund of the state.

The fee imposed by this subsection shall be a debt from the borrower to the collecting agent until such assessment is paid and shall be recoverable at law in the same manner as authorized for the recovery of other debts. Any collecting agent who neglects, fails, or refuses to collect the fee imposed by this subsection shall be liable for the payment of the fee.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1011

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 570, § 9; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 34; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-18/HB 1055; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 6-1/HB 811; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” in subsection (a).

7-1-1012.
Rules and regulations.

Without limitation on the power conferred by Article 1 of this chapter, the department may make reasonable rules and regulations, not inconsistent with law, for the enforcement of this article, to effectuate the purposes of this article, and to clarify the meaning of terms.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1012

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 15; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312.

7-1-1013.
Prohibition of certain acts.

It shall be prohibited for any person transacting a mortgage business in or from this state, including any person required to be licensed or registered under this article and any person exempted from the licensing or registration requirements of this article under Code Section 7-1-1001, to:

Misrepresent the material facts, make false statements or promises, or submit false statements or documents likely to influence, persuade, or induce an applicant for a mortgage loan, a mortgagee, or a mortgagor to take a mortgage loan, or, through agents or otherwise, pursue a course of misrepresentation by use of fraudulent or unauthorized documents or other means to the department or anyone;

Misrepresent or conceal or cause another to misrepresent or conceal material factors, terms, or conditions of a transaction to which a mortgage lender or broker is a party, pertinent to an applicant or application for a mortgage loan or a mortgagor;

Fail to disburse funds in accordance with a written commitment or agreement to make a mortgage loan;

Improperly refuse to issue a satisfaction of a mortgage loan;

Fail to account for or deliver to any person any personal property obtained in connection with a mortgage loan such as money, funds, deposit, check, draft, mortgage, or other document or thing of value which has come into the possession of a licensee or registrant and which is not the property of the licensee or registrant, or which the mortgage lender or broker is not in law or at equity entitled to retain;

Engage in any transaction, practice, or course of business which is not in good faith or fair dealing, or which operates a fraud upon any person, in connection with the attempted or actual making of, purchase of, transfer of, or sale of any mortgage loan;

Engage in any fraudulent home mortgage underwriting practices;

Induce, require, or otherwise permit the applicant for a mortgage loan or mortgagor to sign a security deed, note, loan application, or other pertinent financial disclosure documents with any blank spaces to be filled in after it has been signed, except blank spaces relating to recording or other incidental information not available at the time of signing;

Make, directly or indirectly, any residential mortgage loan with the intent to foreclose on the borrower’s property. For purposes of this paragraph, there shall be a presumption that a person has made a residential mortgage loan with the intent to foreclose on the borrower’s property if the following circumstances can be demonstrated:

Lack of substantial benefit to the borrower;

Lack of probability of full payment of the loan by the borrower; and

A significant proportion of similarly foreclosed loans by such person;

Provide an extension of credit or collect a mortgage debt by extortionate means; or

Purposely withhold, delete, destroy, or alter information requested by an examiner of the department or make false statements or material misrepresentations to the department or the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry or in connection with any investigation conducted by the department or another governmental agency.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1013

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 20; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 38; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 32; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 35/SB 82; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 6-1/HB 811; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” in paragraph (11).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, “paragraph” was substituted for “subsection” in the second sentence of paragraph (9).

7-1-1014.
Regulations governing disclosure required to applicants for mortgage loans.

In addition to such other rules, regulations, and policies as the department may promulgate to effectuate the purposes of this article, the department shall promulgate regulations governing the disclosure required to be made to applicants for mortgage loans, including, without limitation, the following requirements:

Any person required to be licensed or registered under this article shall provide to each applicant for a mortgage loan prior to accepting an application fee or any third-party fee such as a property appraisal fee, credit report fee, or any other similar fee a disclosure of the fees payable and the conditions under which such fees may be refundable;

Any mortgage lender required to be licensed or registered under this article shall make available to each applicant for a mortgage loan at or before the time a commitment to make a mortgage loan is given a written disclosure of the fees to be paid in connection with the commitment and the loan, or the manner in which such fees shall be determined and the conditions under which such fees may be refundable; and

Any mortgage lender required to be licensed or registered under this article shall disclose to each borrower of a mortgage loan that failure to meet every condition of the mortgage loan may result in the loss of the borrower’s property through foreclosure. The borrower shall be required to sign the disclosure at or before the time of the closing of the mortgage loan.

The department may prescribe standards regarding the accuracy of required disclosures and may provide for applicable administrative or civil penalties or fines for failure to provide the disclosures or to meet the prescribed standards.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1014

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 570, § 10; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 16; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312.

7-1-1015.
Rules relative to escrow accounts.

The department may promulgate rules with respect to the placement in escrow accounts by any person required to be licensed or registered by this article of any money, fund, deposit, check, or draft entrusted to it by any persons dealing with it as a residential mortgage loan originator, mortgage broker, mortgage lender, or servicer.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1015

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312.

7-1-1016.
Regulations relative to advertising.

In addition to such other rules, regulations, and policies as the department may promulgate to effectuate the purpose of this article, the department shall prescribe regulations governing the advertising of mortgage loans, including, without limitation, the following requirements:

Advertisements for loans regulated under this article shall not be false, misleading, or deceptive. No person whose activities are regulated under this article shall advertise in any manner so as to indicate or imply that its interest rates or charges for loans are in any way “recommended,” “approved,” “set,” or “established” by the state or this article.

An advertisement shall not include an individual’s loan number, loan amount, or other publicly available information unless it is clearly and conspicuously stated in boldface type at the beginning of the advertisement that the person disseminating it is not authorized by, in sponsorship with, or otherwise affiliated with the individual’s lender, which shall be identified by name. Such an advertisement shall also state that the loan information contained therein was not provided by the recipient’s lender; and

All advertisements, including websites, disseminated by a licensee or a registrant in this state by any means shall contain the name, which shall conform to a name on record with the department, and unique identifier, which shall clearly indicate that the number was issued by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, of the licensee or registrant.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1016

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 570, § 11; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1220, § 13; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 38/SB 70; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 6-1/HB 811; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 22/HB 781; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7/SB 429.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, effective January 1, 2021, added “and” at the end of paragraph (1)(B); in paragraph (2), substituted “which shall conform to a name on record with the department, and” for “license number, Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” and “which shall clearly indicate that the number was issued by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, of the licensee or registrant.” for “and an office address of such licensee or registrant, which shall conform to a name and address on record with the department; and”; and deleted former paragraph (3), which read: “No mortgage broker or mortgage lender licensee shall advertise its services in Georgia in any media disseminated in this state, whether print or electronic, without the words ‘Georgia Residential Mortgage Licensee’ or, for those advertisers licensed in more than one state, a listing of Georgia as a state in which the advertiser is licensed.” The second 2020 amendment, effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” for “Nation-wide Multistate Licensing System and Registry” in paragraph (2). See Editor’s notes.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 54(e)/SB 429, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “In the event of a conflict between a provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2020 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over the conflicting provision in Sections 1 through 53 of this Act to the extent of the conflict.”
Accordingly, the amendment to paragraph (2) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 7(20)(V)/SB 429, was not given effect.

7-1-1017.
Suspension or revocation of licenses, registrations, or mortgage broker education approval; notice; judicial review; effect on preexisting contract.

The department may suspend or revoke an original or renewal license, registration, or mortgage broker education approval on any ground on which it might refuse to issue an original license, registration, or approval or for a violation of any provision of this article or of Chapter 6A of this title or any rule or regulation issued under this article or under Chapter 6A of this title, including failure to provide fees on a timely basis, or for failure of the licensee or registrant to pay, within 30 days after it becomes final, a judgment recovered in any court within this state by a claimant or creditor in an action arising out of the licensee’s or registrant’s business in this state as a mortgage loan originator, mortgage lender, or mortgage broker or for violation of a final order previously issued by the department.

Where an applicant or licensee has been found not in compliance with an order for child support as provided in Code Section 19-6-28.1 or 19-11-9.3, such action shall be sufficient grounds for refusal of a license or suspension of a license. In such actions, the hearing and appeal procedures provided for in those Code sections shall be the only such procedures required under this article. The department shall be permitted to share, without liability, information on its applications or other forms with appropriate state agencies to assist them in recovering child support when required by law.

Where an applicant or licensee has been found to be a borrower in default under the Georgia Higher Education Loan Program as determined by the Georgia Higher Education Assistance Corporation or has been certified by any entity of the federal government for nonpayment or default or breach of a repayment or service obligation under any federal educational loan, loan repayment, or service conditional scholarship program, such action shall not be grounds for refusal of a license or suspension of a license.

Notice of the department’s intention to enter an order denying an application for a license or registration under this article or of an order suspending or revoking a license or registration under this article shall be given to the applicant, licensee, or registrant in writing, sent by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery addressed to the principal place of business of such applicant, licensee, or registrant. Within 20 days of the date of the notice of intention to enter an order of denial, suspension, or revocation under this article, the applicant, licensee, or registrant may request in writing a hearing to contest the order. If a hearing is not requested in writing within 20 days of the date of such notice of intention, the department shall enter a final order regarding the denial, suspension, or revocation. Any final order of the department denying, suspending, or revoking a license or registration shall state the grounds upon which it is based and shall be effective on the date of issuance. A copy thereof shall be forwarded promptly by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery addressed to the principal place of business of such applicant, licensee, or registrant. If a person refuses to accept service of the notice or order by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery, the notice or order shall be served by the commissioner or the commissioner’s authorized representative under any other method of lawful service; and the person shall be personally liable to the commissioner for a sum equal to the actual costs incurred to serve the notice or order. This liability shall be paid upon notice and demand by the commissioner or the commissioner’s representative and shall be assessed and collected in the same manner as other fees or fines administered by the commissioner.

A licensee or registrant may, at the discretion of and with the consent of the department, agree to a voluntary suspension of its license or registration for a period of time to be agreed upon by the parties. Such order of suspension shall be considered a final order and shall be forwarded to the licensee or registrant in the same manner as any other final order. Grounds for such a voluntary suspension shall be the same as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section, and the licensee or registrant may waive its right to an administrative hearing before issuance of the suspension. With the consent of the department, a licensee or registrant may voluntarily surrender its license or registration. A voluntary surrender of a license or registration shall have the same effect as a revocation of said license or registration. A voluntary surrender of a license shall be regarded as a final order of the department.

A decision of the department denying a license or registration application, original or renewal, shall be conclusive, except that it may be subject to judicial review under Code Section 7-1-90. A decision of the department suspending or revoking a license or registration shall be subject to judicial review in the same manner as a decision of the department to take possession of the assets and business of a bank under Code Section 7-1-155.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a revocation, suspension, or surrender of a license or registration shall not impair or affect the obligation of a preexisting contract between the licensee and another person.

Nothing in this article shall preclude a mortgage broker or mortgage lender whose license or registration has been suspended or revoked from continuing to service mortgage loans pursuant to servicing contracts in existence at the time of the suspension or revocation for a period not to exceed six months after the date of the final order of the department suspending or revoking the license or registration.

Whenever a person subject to an order of the department fails to comply with the terms of such order which has been properly issued, the department upon notice of three days to such person may, through the Attorney General, petition the principal court for an order directing such person to obey the order of the department within the period of time fixed by the court. Upon the filing of such petition, the court shall allow a motion to show cause why such motion should not be granted. Whenever, after a hearing upon the merits or after failure of such person to appear when ordered, it shall appear that the order of the department was properly issued, the court shall grant the petition of the department.

Whenever the department initiates an administrative action against a current licensee or an applicant, the department may pursue that action to its conclusion despite the fact that a licensee may withdraw its license or fail to renew it or an applicant may withdraw its application.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-1-1017

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 543, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 570, § 12; Ga. L. 1996, p. 453, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 32; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 31; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1094, § 4; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, § 21; Ga. L. 2005, p. 826, § 36/SB 82; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 39/SB 70; Ga. L. 2009, p. 252, § 1/HB 312; Ga. L. 2011, p. 518, § 17/HB 239; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 34/HB 184; Ga. L. 2019, p. 462, § 1-4/SB 214; Ga. L. 2019, p. 828, § 36/HB 185.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, rewrote the first sentence of paragraph (a)(3), which read: “Where an applicant or licensee has been found to be a borrower in default as provided in Code Section 20-3-295, such action shall be sufficient grounds for refusal of a license or suspension of a license.” and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “In such actions, the hearing and appeal procedures provided for in Code Section 20-3-295 shall be the only such procedures required under this article.” The second 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, deleted the paragraph (b)(1) designation and deleted former paragraph (b)(2), which read: “Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the department may issue a notice of intent to suspend license to a mortgage loan originator when such mortgage loan originator is no longer sponsored by a licensed or registered mortgage broker or lender. If the mortgage loan originator is sponsored by a licensed or registered mortgage broker or lender within 30 days of the date of issuance of the notice of intent to suspend, such notice shall be rescinded. If the mortgage loan originator is not sponsored by a licensed or registered mortgage broker or lender within 30 days of the date of such issuance, the mortgage loan originator license shall automatically expire after 30 days and the person shall not act as a mortgage loan originator unless a new license application is submitted, all applicable fees are paid, and a license is issued by the department.”

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 31 and Ga. L. 1998, p. 1094, § 4, both amended this Code section. These amendments conflicted in the last sentence of paragraph (2) of subsection (a). This sentence was added in 1997 by Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 32. It was determined that the omission of the last sentence of paragraph (2) of subsection (a) by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1094, § 4 was inadvertent and thus the amendments were construed together to read as set out above.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the 2000 amendment applied with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.